Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 12. Confidentiality and Expungement.
§ 16.1-302.1.
Right of victim or representative to attend certain proceedings; notice of hearings.

During proceedings involving petitions or warrants alleging that a juvenile is delinquent, including proceedings on appeal, a victim may remain in the courtroom and shall not be excluded unless the court determines in its discretion, that the presence of the victim would impair the conduct of a fair trial. In any such case involving a minor victim, the court may permit an adult chosen by the minor victim to be present in the courtroom during the proceedings in addition to or in lieu of the minor’s parent or guardian.

The attorney for the Commonwealth shall give prior notice of any such proceedings and changes in the scheduling thereof to any known victim and to any known adult chosen in accordance with this section by a minor victim at the address or telephone number, or both, provided in writing by such persons.

History.

1996, cc. 755, 914; 2000, c. 339.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 339 added “and shall not be excluded unless the court determines in its discretion, that the presence of the victim would impair the conduct of a fair trial” at the end of the first sentence in the first paragraph; and deleted a former second paragraph, which read: “However, if either the attorney for the Commonwealth or any defendant represents to the court that he intends to call as a material witness a victim or any adult chosen by a minor victim, the court, on motion, shall exclude that person from the proceedings.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

§ 16.1-303.
Reports of court officials and employees when privileged.

All information obtained in discharge of official duties by any official or by any employee of the court shall be privileged, and shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the judge unless and until otherwise ordered by the judge or by the judge of a circuit court; provided, however, that in any case when such information shall disclose that an offense has been committed which would be a felony if committed by an adult, it shall be the duty of the official or employee of the court obtaining such information to report the same promptly to the attorney for the Commonwealth or the police in the county, city or town where the offense occurred. It shall not be deemed a violation of this section if the disclosed information is otherwise available to the public.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-209; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 354; 1977, c. 559; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and added the last sentence.

§ 16.1-304.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 499.

Cross references.

As to the retention of records of juvenile and domestic relations district court proceedings, see §

16.1-69.55

.

§ 16.1-305.
Confidentiality of court records.

Social, medical and psychiatric or psychological records, including reports or preliminary inquiries, predisposition studies and supervision records, of neglected and abused children, children in need of services, children in need of supervision and delinquent children shall be filed with the other papers in the juvenile’s case file. All juvenile case files shall be filed separately from adult files and records of the court and shall be open for inspection only to the following:

The judge, probation officers and professional staff assigned to serve the juvenile and domestic relations district courts;

Representatives of a public or private agency or department providing supervision or having legal custody of the child or furnishing evaluation or treatment of the child ordered or requested by the court;

The attorney for any party, including the attorney for the Commonwealth;

Any other person, agency or institution, by order of the court, having a legitimate interest in the case or in the work of the court. However, for the purposes of an investigation conducted by a local community-based probation services agency, preparation of a pretrial investigation report, or of a presentence or postsentence report upon a finding of guilty in a circuit court or for the preparation of a background report for the Parole Board, adult probation and parole officers, including United States Probation and Pretrial Services Officers, any officer of a local pretrial services agency established or operated pursuant to Article 5 (§

19.2-152.2

et seq.) of Chapter 9 of Title 19.2, and any officer of a local community-based probation services agency established or operated pursuant to the Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders (§

9.1-173

et seq.) shall have access to an accused’s or inmate’s records in juvenile court without a court order and for the purpose of preparing the discretionary sentencing guidelines worksheets and related risk assessment instruments as directed by the court pursuant to subsection C of §

19.2-298.01

, the attorney for the Commonwealth and any pretrial services or probation officer shall have access to the defendant’s records in juvenile court without a court order;

Any attorney for the Commonwealth and any local pretrial services or community-based probation officer or state adult probation or parole officer shall have direct access to the defendant’s juvenile court delinquency records maintained in an electronic format by the court for the strictly limited purposes of preparing a pretrial investigation report, including any related risk assessment instrument, any presentence report, any discretionary sentencing guidelines worksheets, including related risk assessment instruments, any post-sentence investigation report or preparing for any transfer or sentencing hearing.A copy of the court order of disposition in a delinquency case shall be provided to a probation officer or attorney for the Commonwealth, when requested for the purpose of calculating sentencing guidelines. The copies shall remain confidential, but reports may be prepared using the information contained therein as provided in §§

19.2-298.01

and

19.2-299

.

The Office of the Attorney General, for all criminal justice activities otherwise permitted and for purposes of performing duties required by Chapter 9 (§

37.2-900

et seq.) of Title 37.2.

All or any part of the records enumerated in subsection A, or information secured from such records, which is presented to the judge in court or otherwise in a proceeding under this law shall also be made available to the parties to the proceedings and their attorneys.

All other juvenile records, including the docket, petitions, motions and other papers filed with a case, transcripts of testimony, findings, verdicts, orders and decrees shall be open to inspection only by those persons and agencies designated in subsections A and B. However, a licensed bail bondsman shall be entitled to know the status of a bond he has posted or provided surety on for a juvenile under §

16.1-258

. This shall not authorize a bail bondsman to have access to or inspect any other portion of his principal’s juvenile court records.

Attested copies of papers filed in connection with an adjudication of guilty for an offense for which the clerk is required by §

46.2-383

to furnish an abstract to the Department of Motor Vehicles, which shows the charge, finding, disposition, name of the attorney for the juvenile, or waiver of attorney shall be furnished to an attorney for the Commonwealth upon certification by the prosecuting attorney that such papers are needed as evidence in a pending criminal or traffic proceeding and that such papers will be only used for such evidentiary purpose.

Upon request, a copy of the court order of disposition in a delinquency case shall be provided to the Virginia Workers’ Compensation Commission solely for purposes of determining whether to make an award to the victim of a crime, and such information shall not be disseminated or used by the Commission for any other purpose including but not limited to actions pursuant to §

19.2-368.15

.

Staff of the court services unit or the attorney for the Commonwealth shall provide notice of the disposition in a case involving a juvenile who is committed to state care after being adjudicated for a criminal sexual assault as specified in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2 to the victim or a parent of a minor victim, upon request. Additionally, if the victim or parent submits a written request, the Department of Juvenile Justice shall provide advance notice of such juvenile offender’s anticipated date of release from commitment.

Any record in a juvenile case file which is open for inspection by the professional staff of the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to subsection A and is maintained in an electronic format by the court, may be transmitted electronically to the Department of Juvenile Justice. Any record so transmitted shall be subject to the provisions of §

16.1-300

.

A1.

Any person, agency, or institution that may inspect juvenile case files pursuant to subdivisions A 1 through 4 shall be authorized to have copies made of such records, subject to any restrictions, conditions, or prohibitions that the court may impose.

B1.

If a juvenile 14 years of age or older at the time of the offense is adjudicated delinquent on the basis of an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult, all court records regarding that adjudication and any subsequent adjudication of delinquency, other than those records specified in subsection A, shall be open to the public. However, if a hearing was closed, the judge may order that certain records or portions thereof remain confidential to the extent necessary to protect any juvenile victim or juvenile witness.

D1.

Attested copies of papers filed in connection with an adjudication of guilt for a delinquent act that would be a felony if committed by an adult, which show the charge, finding, disposition, name of the attorney for the juvenile, or waiver of attorney by the juvenile, shall be furnished to an attorney for the Commonwealth upon his certification that such papers are needed as evidence in a pending criminal prosecution for a violation of §

18.2-308.2

and that such papers will be only used for such evidentiary purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-162; 1956, c. 555; 1958, c. 353; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 228; 1975, c. 334; 1977, c. 559; 1979, c. 605; 1983, c. 389; 1984, c. 34; 1988, c. 541; 1989, c. 182; 1990, c. 258; 1992, c. 547; 1994, c. 603; 1995, c. 430; 1996, cc. 755, 870, 914; 1998, cc. 278, 521; 2002, cc. 701, 735, 741; 2003, c. 143; 2004, c. 446; 2007, c. 133; 2009, cc. 138, 308, 740; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 463.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and inserted “children in need of supervision” following “children in need of services” near the middle of subsection A, inserted “including the attorney for the Commonwealth” following “any party” in subdivision A 3, and added subsection B1.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendment by c. 278 added subsection G.

The 1998 amendment by c. 521 added the second paragraph in subdivision A 4.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 701 and 735 are identical, and rewrote subdivision A 4.

The 2002 amendment by c. 741 inserted the next-to-last paragraph of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 143 substituted “any pretrial services or” for “the” in the last sentence of subdivision A 4; inserted the subdivision A 5 designation; and in subdivision A 5, substituted “Any” for “The,” “any local pretrial services or community-based” for “any,” inserted “pretrial investigation report, including any related risk assessment instrument, any,” substituted “any” for “preparing,” and inserted “worksheets, including related risk assessment instruments, any post-sentence investigation report”; and substituted “14” for “fourteen” in subsection B1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 446 added the last two sentences in subsection C; and inserted subsection D1.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 133, in subdivision A 4, in the second sentence, inserted “services” following “community-based probation” near the beginning and substituted “community-based probation services agency” for “community-based probation program” near the middle.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 138 and 308 are identical, and added subsection A1.

The 2009 amendment by c. 740 added subdivision A 6.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 463, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “of this section” at the end of the first sentence in subsection C; and, in subsection D, substituted “or traffic” for “traffic or habitual offender” and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

16 M.J. Right of Privacy, § 1.

§ 16.1-305.01.
Access to child and spousal support case files.

All child support and spousal support case files, whether physical or digital, shall be open for inspection only to the following:

The judge, court officials, and clerk or deputy clerk assigned to serve the court in which the case is pending or to which the case is transferred pursuant to court order;

Any party to the case;

Any attorney of record to the case; and

The Department of Social Services and the Division of Child Support Enforcement.Any other person, agency, or institution having a legitimate interest in such case files or the work of the court, by order of the court, may inspect the case files.

History.

2018, c. 18.

§ 16.1-305.1.
Disclosure of disposition in certain delinquency cases.

Upon a court’s disposition of a proceeding where a juvenile is charged with a crime listed in subsection G of §

16.1-260

in which a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent, convicted, found not guilty or the charges are reduced, the clerk of the court in which the disposition is entered shall, within 15 days of the expiration of the appeal period, if there has been no notice of an appeal, provide written notice of the disposition ordered by the court, including the nature of the offense upon which the disposition was based, to the superintendent of the school division in which the child is enrolled at the time of the disposition or, if he is not then enrolled in school, the division in which he was enrolled at the time of the offense. If the court defers disposition, or the charges are nolle prosequi, withdrawn, or dismissed the clerk shall, within 15 days of such action, provide written notice of such action to the superintendent of the school division in which the child is enrolled at such time or, if he is not then enrolled in school, the division in which he was enrolled at the time of the offense. If charges are withdrawn in intake or handled informally without a court disposition, the intake officer shall, within 15 days of such action, provide written notification of the action to the superintendent of the school division in which the child is enrolled at that time or, if he is not then enrolled in school, the division in which he was enrolled at the time of the offense.

If the child is not enrolled in the school division that receives notification under this section, the superintendent of that division may forward the notification to the superintendent of the school division where the child is enrolled.

A superintendent who receives notification under this section may disclose the information received to anyone to whom he or a principal disclosed that a petition had been filed. Further disclosure of information received under this section by the superintendent to school personnel is authorized only as provided in § 22.1-288.2.

History.

1993, cc. 645, 889; 1994, cc. 835, 913; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 1997, c. 371; 1999, c. 952; 2003, c. 119.

Cross references.

As to authority to suspend or expel a student about whom a report of an adjudication of delinquency or conviction pursuant to this section has been received, see § 22.1-277.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in the first sentence, in clause (viii), inserted “and related offenses” following “burglary” and inserted “through

18.2-93

” following “§

18.2-89

.”

The 1999 amendment

substituted “a firearm offense” for “the unlawful purchase, possession or use of a weapon,” substituted “Articles “ for “Article,” and inserted “5 (§

18.2-288

et seq.), 6 (§

18.2-299

et seq.), or 7 (§

18.2-308

)” in clause (i); and added clause (ix).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 16.1-305.2.
Disclosure of notice of the filing of a petition and certain reports by division superintendent.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a division superintendent shall not disclose information contained in or derived from a (i) notice of petition received pursuant to §

16.1-260

or (ii) report received pursuant to §

66-25.2:1

. If the juvenile is not enrolled as a student in a public school in the division to which the notice or report was given, the superintendent shall promptly so notify the intake officer of the juvenile court in which the petition was filed or the Director of the Department who sent the report and may forward the notice of petition or report to the superintendent of the division in which the juvenile is enrolled, if known.

If the division superintendent believes that disclosure of information regarding a petition to school personnel is necessary to ensure the physical safety of the juvenile, other students or school personnel within the division, he may at any time prior to receipt of the notice of disposition in accordance with §

16.1-305.1

, disclose the fact of the filing of the petition and the nature of the offense to the principal of the school in which the juvenile who is the subject of the petition is enrolled. The principal may further disseminate the information regarding a petition, after the juvenile has been taken into custody, whether or not the child has been released, only to those students and school personnel having direct contact with the juvenile and need of the information to ensure physical safety or the appropriate educational placement or other educational services.

If the division superintendent believes that disclosure of information regarding a report received pursuant to §

66-25.2:1

to school personnel is necessary to ensure the physical safety of the juvenile, other students, or school personnel within the division he may disclose the information to the principal of the school in which the juvenile is enrolled. The principal may further disseminate the information regarding such report only to school personnel as necessary to protect the juvenile, the subject or subjects of the danger, other students, or school personnel.

History.

1995, c. 429; 2003, c. 119; 2009, c. 276.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 inserted “and may forward the notice of petition to the superintendent of the division in which the juvenile is enrolled, if known” in the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 276, in the first paragraph, inserted the clause (i) designator, inserted clause (ii) in the first sentence, inserted “or report” following “which the notice,” “or the Director of the department who sent the report” following “petition was filed” and “or report” following “notice of petition” in the second sentence; in the second paragraph, inserted “of information regarding a petition” preceding “to school personnel” in the first sentence, inserted “regarding a petition” following “disseminate the information” in the second sentence; and added the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey, “A Look Back and Forward: Legislative and Regulatory Highlights for 2008 and 2009 and a Discussion of Juvenile Transfer,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 53 (2009).

§ 16.1-306.
Expungement of court records.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

16.1-69.55

, the clerk of the juvenile and domestic relations district court shall, on January 2 of each year or on a date designated by the court, destroy its files, papers and records, including electronic records, connected with any proceeding concerning a juvenile in such court, if such juvenile has attained the age of 19 years and five years have elapsed since the date of the last hearing in any case of the juvenile which is subject to this section. However, if the juvenile was found guilty of an offense for which the clerk is required by §

46.2-383

to furnish an abstract to the Department of Motor Vehicles, the records shall be destroyed when the juvenile has attained the age of 29. If the juvenile was found guilty of a delinquent act which would be a felony if committed by an adult, the records shall be retained.

However, in all files in which the court records concerning a juvenile contain a finding of guilty of any offense ancillary to (i) a delinquent act that would be a felony if committed by an adult or (ii) any offense for which the clerk is required by §

46.2-383

to furnish an abstract to the Department of Motor Vehicles, the records of any such ancillary offense shall also be retained for the time specified for the felony or the offense reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles as specified in subsection A, and all such records shall be available for inspection as provided in §

16.1-305

.

A person who has been the subject of a delinquency or traffic proceeding and (i) has been found innocent thereof or (ii) such proceeding was otherwise dismissed, may file a motion requesting the destruction of all records pertaining to such charge. Notice of such motion shall be given to the attorney for the Commonwealth. Unless good cause is shown why such records should not be destroyed, the court shall grant the motion, and shall send copies of the order to all officers or agencies that are repositories of such records, and all such officers and agencies shall comply with the order.

Each person shall be notified of his rights under subsections A and C of this section at the time of his dispositional hearing.

Upon destruction of the records of a proceeding as provided in subsections A, B, and C, the violation of law shall be treated as if it never occurred. All index references shall be deleted and the court and law-enforcement officers and agencies shall reply and the person may reply to any inquiry that no record exists with respect to such person.

All docket sheets shall be destroyed in the sixth year after the last hearing date recorded on the docket sheet.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-193; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1979, cc. 736, 737; 1989, c. 183; 1990, c. 258; 1993, cc. 468, 589, 926; 1994, cc. 859, 949; 1996, c. 463; 2008, c. 519; 2014, c. 271.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section, and enactment of
§ 16.1-306.1, by Acts
1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth.” The funding was not provided.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 519, in subsection A, inserted “including electronic records” near the beginning and substituted “19 years” for “nineteen years” near the middle of the first sentence; and substituted “29” for “twenty-nine” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 271, in subsection B substituted “However, in” for “In” preceding “all files”; inserted “any offense ancillary to (i)” following “guilty of”; substituted “that” for “which” following “act”, “(ii) any” for “an” following “adult or” and “, the records of any such ancillary offense shall also be retained for the time specified for the felony or the offense reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles as specified in subsection A, and all such records shall be” for “together with findings of not innocent of other acts, all of the records of such juvenile subject to this section shall be retained and”; in subsection C substituted “such” for “the” preceding “charge” and “delinquency” for “of such an act of” following “charge.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 261 (1980).

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

§ 16.1-307.
Circuit court records regarding juveniles.

In proceedings against a juvenile in the circuit court in which the circuit court deals with the child in the same manner as a case in the juvenile court, the clerk of the court shall preserve all records connected with the proceedings in files separate from other files and records of the court as provided in §

16.1-302

. Except as provided in §§

19.2-389.1

and

19.2-390

, such records shall be open for inspection only in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-305

and shall be subject to expungement provisions of §

16.1-306

. In proceedings in which a juvenile, fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense, was adjudicated delinquent in juvenile court on the basis of an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult, or was found guilty of a felony in the circuit court, any court records, other than those specified in subsection A of §

16.1-305

, regarding that adjudication or conviction and any subsequent adjudication of delinquency or conviction of a crime, shall be available and shall be treated in the same manner as adult criminal records.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1990, c. 258; 1993, cc. 468, 926; 1996, cc. 755, 914.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts
1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts
1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and substituted “juvenile” for “child” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Automatic expungement of juvenile proceedings. —

Circuit court clerk has a duty under §

16.1-307

to automatically expunge juvenile charges that have been dismissed or nolle prosequi, upon the passage of the time periods specified in §

16.1-306

. See opinion of Attorney General to Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, Senate of Virginia, 20-010, 2021 Va. AG LEXIS 16 (5/21/21).

§ 16.1-308.
Effect of adjudication on status of child.

Except as otherwise provided by law for a juvenile found guilty of a felony in circuit court whose case is disposed of in the same manner as an adult criminal case, a finding of guilty on a petition charging delinquency under the provisions of this law shall not operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by conviction for a crime, nor shall any such finding operate to disqualify the child for employment by any state or local governmental agency.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the State Police or a police department or sheriff’s office that is a part of or administered by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof from denying employment to a person who had been adjudicated delinquent where such denial is based on the nature and gravity of the offense, the time since adjudication, the time since completion of any sentence, and the nature of the job sought.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-179; 1956, c. 555; 1977, c. 559; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2011, c. 622.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and inserted “Except as otherwise provided by law for a juvenile found guilty of a felony in circuit court whose case is disposed of in the same manner as an adult criminal case” preceding “a finding of guilty on a petition” and inserted “civil” preceding “disabilities.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 622 added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For comment, “Jury Trials for Juvenile Delinquents in Virginia,” see 28 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 135 (1971).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 59; 9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, § 19; 17 M.J. Statutes, § 40; 20 M.J. Weapons, §§ 7.2, 13.

§ 16.1-309.
Penalty.

Except as provided in §§

16.1-299

,

16.1-300

,

16.1-301

,

16.1-305

and

16.1-307

, any person who (i) files a petition, (ii) receives a petition or has access to court records in an official capacity, (iii) participates in the investigation of allegations which form the basis of a petition, (iv) is interviewed concerning such allegations and whose information is derived solely from such interview or (v) is present during any court proceeding, who discloses or makes use of or knowingly permits the use of identifying information not otherwise available to the public concerning a juvenile who is suspected of being or is the subject of a proceeding within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to subdivisions A 1 through 5 or subdivision A 7 of §

16.1-241

or who is in the custody of the State Department of Juvenile Justice, which information is directly or indirectly derived from the records or files of a law-enforcement agency, court or the Department of Juvenile Justice or acquired in the course of official duties, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any law-enforcement officer or school employee who discloses to school personnel identifying information concerning a juvenile who is suspected of committing or has committed a delinquent act that has met applicable criteria of §

16.1-260

and is committed or alleged to have been committed on school property during a school-sponsored activity or on the way to or from such activity, if the disclosure is made solely for the purpose of enabling school personnel to take appropriate disciplinary action within the school setting against the juvenile. Further, the provisions of this section shall not apply to school personnel who disclose information obtained pursuant to §§

16.1-305.1

and 22.1-288.2, if the disclosure is made in compliance with those sections.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 626; 1979, c. 481; 1989, cc. 520, 733; 1993, cc. 645, 889; 1994, cc. 835, 913; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2003, c. 119; 2017, c. 623.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the clause (i) through (v) designations and inserted “not otherwise available to the public” following “identifying information” in clause (v).

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 119 substituted “in compliance with those sections” for “solely to enable school personnel to take appropriate actions within the school setting with regard to the juvenile or another student” at the end of subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, in subsection A, substituted “subdivisions A 1 through 5 or subdivision A 7 of §

16.1-241

” for “subdivisions 1 through 5 of subsection A of §

16.1-241

.”

Law Review.

For survey on legal issues involving children in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 705 (1989).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For annual survey article on legal issues involving children, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 161 (2003).